otworsen.foma
# Simple OT syllabification
# Following Gerdemann & Hulden (2012)
# We have three constraints:
# Peak >> Complex >> Onset

def V [a|e|i|o|u];
def C [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z];

def Gen         ?+ -> %[ ... %] ;
def MarkPeak    [..] -> "*" || %[ _ \V* %] , %[ _ C* V C* V;
def MarkComplex [..] -> "*" || %[ _ C C , C C _ %];
def MarkOnset   [..] -> "*" || %[ _ V;

# Implement one constraint by composing [Gen .o. TheConstraint] .o. Filter;
# Where Filter removes those candidates that can be produced by 
# adding at least one violation to each candidate (and shuffling brackets)

def Worsen [?* 0:"*" ?*];

def AddOne Worsen .o. Gen;

regex AddOne;
